Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 430.342 is amended to read:
430.342. (1) The governing body of each county or combination of counties in  a mental health
administrative area, as designated by the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission, shall:
(a) Appoint a local planning committee for alcohol and drug prevention and treatment  services;
or
(b) Designate an already existing body  to act as the local planning committee for alcohol and
drug prevention and treatment services.
(2) The committee shall  coordinate with local Behavioral Health Resource Networks, de-
scribed in ORS 430.389, to  identify needs and establish priorities for alcohol and drug prevention
and treatment services that best suit the needs  and values of the community and shall report its
findings to the Oregon Health  Authority, the governing bodies of the counties served by the com-
mittee and the budget advisory committee of the commission.
(3) Members of the local planning committee shall  be representative of the geographic area and
shall be persons  with interest or experience in developing alcohol and drug prevention and treat-
ment services. The membership of  the committee shall include a number of minority members which
reasonably reflects the proportion of the need  for prevention, treatment and rehabilitation services
of minorities in the community.
SECTION 2.  ORS 430.383 is amended to read:
430.383. (1)(a) The people of Oregon find that drug addiction and  overdoses are a serious prob-
lem in Oregon and that Oregon needs to expand access to drug treatment.
(b) The people of Oregon further find that a health-based approach to addiction  and overdose
is more  effective, humane and cost-effective than criminal punishments. Making people criminals
because they suffer from addiction is expensive, ruins lives and can make access to treatment  and
recovery more difficult.
(2)(a) The purpose of the Drug Addiction Treatment and Recovery Act of  2020 is to make
screening, health assessment, treatment and recovery services for  drug addiction available to all
those who need  and want access to those services and to adopt a health approach to drug addiction
by removing criminal penalties for low-level drug possession.
(b) It is the policy of the State of Oregon :
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 1
(A) That screening,  health assessment, treatment and recovery services for drug addiction are
available to all those who need and want access to those services ; and
(B) To encourage treatment and recovery for people struggling with substance use .
(3) The provisions of [ chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 ] 430.383 to 430.390 , shall be interpreted
consistently with the findings, purposes and policy objectives stated  in this section and shall not be
limited by any policy set  forth in Oregon law that could conflict with or be interpreted to conflict
with the purposes and policy objectives stated in this section.
(4) As used  in ORS 430.383 to 430.390, “recovery” means a process of change through
which individuals improve their health and wellness, live a self-directed life  and strive to
reach their full potential.
SECTION 3.  ORS 430.384 is amended to read:
430.384. (1) The Drug Treatment and  Recovery Services Fund is established in the State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Drug Treatment and Re-
covery Services Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) The Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund shall consist of:
(a) Moneys deposited into the fund pursuant to ORS 305.231;
(b) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly;
(c) Moneys allocated from the Oregon Marijuana Account, pursuant to ORS 475C.726 (3)(b);
(d) Moneys allocated from the Criminal Fine Account pursuant to ORS 137.300 (4); and
(e) All other moneys deposited into the fund from any source.
(3) Moneys in the fund  shall be continuously appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority for
the purposes set forth in ORS 430.389.
(4)(a) Pursuant to subsection  (2)(b) of this section, the Legislative Assembly shall appropriate
or transfer to the fund an amount sufficient to fully fund the  grants program required by ORS
430.389.
(b) The total amount deposited  and transferred into the fund shall not be less than $57 million
for the first year [ chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021, is ] ORS 430.383 to 430.390 are  in effect.
(c) In each subsequent year, the minimum transfer amount  set forth in paragraph (b) of this
subsection shall be increased by not less than the sum of:
(A) $57 million multiplied by  the percentage, if any, by which the monthly averaged U.S. City
Average Consumer Price Index for the 12 consecutive months ending  August 31 of the prior calen-
dar year exceeds the monthly index for the fourth quarter of the calendar year 2020; and
(B) The annual increase, if any, in moneys distributed pursuant to ORS 475C.726 (3)(b).
SECTION 4.
 ORS 430.387 is amended to read:
430.387. The Oregon Health  Authority shall cause the moneys in the Drug Treatment and Re-
covery Services Fund to be distributed as follows:
[(1)(a)] (1) An amount necessary for  the  administration of ORS 430.388 to 430.390 [ not to exceed
four percent of the moneys deposited into the fund in any biennium. ]
[(b) The amounts necessary  for administration described in paragraph (a) of this subsection do not
include expenditures ], excluding amounts necessary to establish and maintain  the telephone
hotline described in ORS 430.391 (1).
(2) After the distribution set forth in subsection  (1) of this section, the remaining moneys in the
fund shall be distributed to the grants program as set forth in ORS 430.389.
SECTION 5.  ORS 430.388 is amended to read:
430.388. [(1)(a)] (1) The [ Director  of the Oregon Health Authority shall establish an ] Oversight and
Accountability Council  is established  for the purpose of  [ determining how funds will be distributed
to grant applicants and to oversee ] overseeing the implementation of the Behavioral Health Resource
Networks pursuant to ORS 430.389. [ The council shall be formed on or before February 1, 2021. ]
[(b)] (2)  The [ council] members of the council  shall [ consist of ] be  qualified individuals with
experience in substance use [ disorder] treatment and other addiction services[ . The  council shall ]
and consist of :
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 2
(a) At least one member from each of the following categories [ only] appointed by the
director:
(A) A representative of  the Oregon Health Authority, Health Systems Division Behavioral
Health Services as a nonvoting member;
(B) Three members of communities that have been  disproportionately impacted by arrests,
prosecution or sentencing  for conduct that has been classified or reclassified as a Class E violation;
(C) A physician specializing in addiction medicine;
(D) A licensed clinical social worker;
(E) An evidence-based substance use [ disorder] treatment  provider;
(F) A harm reduction services provider;
(G) A person specializing in housing services for people with substance  use [ disorder] or a di-
agnosed mental health condition;
(H) An academic researcher specializing in drug use or drug policy;
(I) At least two people who suffered or suffer from substance use [ disorder];
(J) At least two recovery peers;
(K) A mental or behavioral health care provider;
(L) A representative of a coordinated care organization;  and
(M) A person who works for a nonprofit organization that  advocates for persons who experience
or have experienced substance use [ disorder]; and
[(N)] (b) The Director  of the Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission or the director’s designated
staff person, as [ a] an ex officio  nonvoting member.
(3) The director shall  appoint an executive director who shall report to and be responsible
for the duties assigned by the director of the division  within the authority that is responsible
for behavioral health in consultation with the council.
[(2)] (4)  A quorum consists of [ two-thirds] a majority  of the members of  the council[ , rounded
up to the next odd number of members ].
[(3)] (5) The term of office for  a member of the council is four years. [ Vacancies shall be ap-
pointed for the unexpired term. ] Members are  eligible for reappointment. If there is a vacancy
for any cause, the director shall make an appointment to become immediately  available for
the unexpired term plus two years, but not more than a total of four years.
[(4)(a)] (6)(a)  To the extent permissible by law, a member  of the council performing services for
the council may  receive compensation from the member’s employer for time spent performing ser-
vices as a council member.
(b) If a member of the council is not compensated by the member’s  employer as set forth in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, that member shall  be entitled to compensation and expenses as
provided in ORS 292.495.
[(5)] (7)  Members of the council are subject to and must  comply with the provisions of ORS
chapter 244, including ORS 244.045 (4), 244.047, 244.120 and 244.130.
SECTION 6.
(1) Notwithstanding the terms of office specified in ORS 430.388,  eight voting
members currently serving  on the Oversight and Accountability Council shall be reappointed
for two-year terms at the end of their current terms, including:
(a) At least  one member from each category described in ORS 430.388 (2)(a)(B), (2)(a)(I)
and (2)(a)(J); and
(b) Others chosen by lot.
(2) The successors to the  members who are reappointed to two-year terms shall be ap-
pointed to four-year terms.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 430.389 is amended to read:
430.389. (1) The  Oversight and Accountability Council shall [ oversee and ] approve grants and
funding provided by the Oregon Health Authority in accordance with this  section to implement
Behavioral Health Resource  Networks and increase access to community care[ , as set forth below ].
A Behavioral Health Resource  Network is an entity or collection of entities that individually or
jointly provide some or all of the services described in subsection [ (2)(d)] (2)(e) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 3
(2)(a) [ The Oversight and  Accountability Council, in consultation with ] The [ Oregon Health ]
authority[ ,] shall [ provide] establish an equitable:
(A) Process for applying for  grants and funding [ to] by  agencies or organizations, whether
government or community based,  to establish Behavioral Health Resource Networks for the pur-
poses of immediately screening the acute needs of  [ people who use drugs ] individuals with sub-
stance use, including  those who also have a mental illness,  and assessing and addressing any
ongoing needs through ongoing case management, harm reduction, treatment, housing and  linkage
to other care and services.
(B) Evaluation process to assess the  effectiveness of Behavioral Health Resource Net-
works that receive grants or funding.
(b) Recipients of grants or funding [ to provide substance  use disorder treatment or services ] must
be licensed, certified or credentialed by  the state, including certification under ORS 743A.168 (8),
or meet criteria  prescribed by rule by the [ Oversight and Accountability Council ] authority  under
ORS 430.390. A  recipient of a grant or funding under this subsection may not use the grant or
funding to supplant the recipient’s existing funding.
[(b)] (c)  The council and the  authority shall ensure that residents of each county have access
to all of the services described in paragraph [ (d)] (e)  of this subsection.
[(c)] (d) Applicants for grants and funding may apply individually or jointly with other network
participants to provide services in one or more counties.
[(d)] (e)  A network  must have the capacity to provide the following services and any other
services specified by the [ council] authority  by rule but no individual participant in a network
is required to provide all of the services :
(A) Screening by certified addiction peer support or wellness specialists or other  qualified per-
sons designated  by the council to determine a client’s need for immediate medical or other treatment
to determine what acute care is needed and  where it can be best provided, identify other needs and
link the client to other appropriate local or statewide services, including  treatment for substance
abuse and coexisting health problems, housing,  employment, training and child care. Networks shall
provide this service 24 hours a day, seven days a  week, every calendar day of the year  through a
telephone line or other means. Networks may rely on the statewide telephone hotline  estab-
lished by the authority under ORS 430.391 for telephone  screenings during nonbusiness hours
such as evenings, weekends and holidays . Notwithstanding paragraph [ (b)] (c)  of this subsection,
only one  grantee in each network within each county is required to provide the screenings described
in this subparagraph.
(B) Comprehensive behavioral health needs assessment,  including a substance use [ disorder]
screening by a certified alcohol and drug counselor or other  credentialed addiction treatment pro-
fessional. The assessment shall prioritize the self-identified needs of a client.
(C) Individual intervention planning, case management and connection to services. If, after  the
completion of a screening, a client indicates a desire to address some or all of the identified needs,
a case manager shall work with the client to design an individual intervention plan. The plan  must
address the client’s need for substance use  [disorder] treatment, coexisting health problems, housing,
employment and training, child care and other services.
(D) Ongoing  peer counseling and support from screening and assessment through implementation
of individual intervention plans as well as peer  outreach workers to engage directly with
marginalized community members who could potentially benefit from the network’s services.
(E) Assessment of the need for, and provision of, mobile or virtual outreach services to:
(i) Reach clients who are unable to access the network; and
(ii) Increase public awareness of network services.
(F) Harm reduction services and information and education about harm reduction services.
(G) Low-barrier substance use [ disorder] treatment.
(H) Transitional and supportive housing for individuals with substance use [ disorders].
[(e)] (f)  If an applicant for a grant or funding under this subsection is unable to provide all of
the services  described in paragraph [ (d)] (e)  of this subsection, the applicant may identify how the
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 4
applicant intends to partner with other entities to  provide the services, and the [ Oregon Health ]
authority and the council may facilitate collaboration among applicants.
[(f)] (g) All services provided through the networks must be evidence-informed,  trauma-informed,
culturally specific, linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental. The goal shall be
to address effectively the client’s substance use and any other social determinants of health.
[(g)] (h)  The networks must  be adequately staffed to address the needs of people with substance
use [ disorders] within their regions as prescribed by the [ council] authority  by rule, including, at
a minimum, at least one person [ qualified by the Oregon Health Authority ] in each of the following
categories:
(A) [ Certified] Alcohol and drug counselor  certified  by the authority  or other credentialed
addiction treatment professional;
(B) Case manager; [ and]
(C) [ Certified] Addiction peer support [ or] specialist certified by the authority;
(D) Addiction peer  wellness specialist  certified by the authority;
(E) Recovery mentor, certified by the Mental Health  and Addiction Certification Board
of Oregon or its successor organization; and
(F) Youth support specialist certified by the authority .
[(h)] (i)  Verification of a screening by a certified  addiction peer support specialist, wellness
specialist or other person in accordance with  [ subsection (2)(d)(A) of this section ] paragraph (e)(A)
of this subsection  shall promptly be provided to the client by the entity conducting  the screening.
If the client executes a valid release of information,  the entity shall provide verification of the
screening to the  [Oregon Health ] authority or a contractor of the authority and the authority or the
authority’s contractor shall forward the verification  to the court, in the manner prescribed by the
Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, to satisfy the conditions for dismissal under ORS 153.062 or
475.237.
(3)(a) If moneys remain in the Drug Treatment and  Recovery Services Fund after the council
has committed grants and funding to establish behavioral health resource  networks serving every
county in this state,  the council shall [ provide] authorize grants and funding to other agencies or
organizations, whether government or community based, and to the nine federally recognized tribes
in this state and service providers  that are affiliated with the nine federally recognized tribes in this
state to increase access to one or more of the following:
(A) Low-barrier substance use [ disorder] treatment that is evidence-informed, trauma-informed,
culturally specific, linguistically responsive, person-centered and nonjudgmental;
(B) Peer support and recovery services;
(C) Transitional, supportive and permanent housing for persons with substance use [ disorder];
(D) Harm reduction interventions including, but  not limited to, overdose prevention education,
access to naloxone hydrochloride and sterile syringes and stimulant-specific drug education and
outreach; or
(E) Incentives and supports  to expand the behavioral health workforce to support the services
delivered by behavioral health resource networks  and entities receiving grants or funding under this
subsection.
(b) A recipient of a grant or funding under this subsection may not use the grant or funding  to
supplant the recipient’s existing funding.
(4) In awarding grants and funding under subsections [ (2)] (1) and (3) of this section, the  council
shall:
(a) Distribute grants and funding to ensure access to:
(A) Historically underserved populations; and
(B) Culturally specific and linguistically responsive services.
(b) Consider any inventories or surveys of currently available behavioral health services.
(c) Consider available regional data related to  the substance use [ disorder] treatment needs and
the access to culturally specific and linguistically responsive services in communities in this state.
(d) Consider the needs of  residents of this state for services, supports and treatment at all ages.
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 5
(5) The council shall require any government entity that applies for a grant to  specify in the
application details regarding subgrantees  and how the government entity will fund culturally spe-
cific organizations and culturally specific services. A government entity receiving a grant  must
make an explicit commitment not to  supplant or decrease any existing funding used to provide ser-
vices funded by the grant.
(6) In determining grants and funding to be  awarded, the council may consult the comprehensive
addiction, prevention, treatment and recovery plan established by  the Alcohol and Drug Policy
Commission under ORS 430.223 and the advice  of any other group, agency, organization or individ-
ual that desires to provide advice to the council that is consistent with the terms of this section.
(7) Services provided by grantees, including services provided by a Behavioral Health  Resource
Network,  shall  be free of charge to the clients receiving the services. Grantees in each network
shall seek reimbursement from  insurance issuers, the medical assistance program or any other third
party responsible for the cost of services provided  to a client and grants and funding provided by
the council or the authority  under [ subsection (2) of ] this section may be used for copayments,
deductibles or other out-of-pocket costs incurred by the client for the services.
(8) Subsection (7) of this  section does not require the medical assistance program to reimburse
the cost of services for which another third party is responsible in violation of 42 U.S.C. 1396a(25).
SECTION 8.  ORS 430.390 is amended to read:
430.390. (1)(a) [ On or before  September 1, 2021, the Oversight and Accountability Council ] The
Oregon Health Authority  shall  adopt rules that establish  a grant application process, a process
to appeal the denial of a grant and  general criteria and requirements for the  Behavioral Health
Resource Networks and  the grants and funding required by ORS 430.389, including rules requiring
recipients of grants and funding to collect and report information necessary for the Secretary  of
State to conduct the financial and performance audits required by ORS 430.392.
[(b) The council shall from time to time  adopt such rules, and amend and revise rules the council
has adopted, as the council deems proper and necessary for the administration of  chapter 2, Oregon
Laws 2021, and the performance of the council’s work. ]
(b) When adopting or amending rules  under this subsection, the authority shall convene
an advisory committee in accordance  with ORS 183.333 in which members of the Oversight
and Accountability Council compose a majority of the membership.
(2) [ On and after  July 1, 2021, ] The council shall have and retain the  authority to [ implement
and] oversee the Behavioral Health Resource Networks established under ORS 430.389 and approve
the grants and funding under ORS 430.389.
(3) The  [ Oregon Health ] authority shall administer and provide all necessary support to ensure
the implementation of [ chapter 2, Oregon Laws 2021 ] ORS  430.383 to 430.390 , and that recipients
of grants or funding comply with all applicable rules regulating the provision  of behavioral health
services.
(4)(a) The authority, in consultation with  the council, may enter into interagency agreements to
ensure proper distribution of funds for the grants required by ORS 430.389.
(b) The authority shall encourage and take all  reasonable measures to ensure that grant recip-
ients cooperate, coordinate and act jointly with one another to offer the  services described in ORS
430.389.
(c) The authority  shall post to the authority’s website, at the time a grant or funding is awarded:
(A) The name of the recipient of the grant or funding;
(B) The names of any subgrantees  or subcontractors of the recipient of the grant or funding; and
(C) The amount of the grant or funding awarded.
(5) The authority  shall provide requested technical, logistical and other support to the council
to assist the council with the council’s duties and obligations.
(6) The Department of Justice shall provide legal services to the council if  requested to assist
the council in carrying out the council’s duties and obligations.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 430.391 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 6
430.391. (1) [ Not later than February  1, 2021, ] The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a
Behavioral Health Resource Network statewide telephone hotline to[ :]
[(a) Provide screenings under ORS 430.389 (2)(d) to any resident in  this state by certified addiction
peer support or wellness specialists, as defined by  the authority by rule, or other qualified persons
designated by the Oversight and Accountability Council; ]
[(b) Assess a caller’s need for immediate medical care or other treatment and determine  what acute
care is needed and where it can be provided; ]
[(c) Identify other needs of the caller; and ]
[(d) Link the caller to other appropriate local or  statewide services, including treatment for sub-
stance abuse and other coexisting health problems, housing, employment, training and child  care ]
provide screenings described in ORS 430.389 (2)(e)(A) to any caller who is  a resident of this
state.
(2) The telephone hotline shall be staffed 24 hours a day, seven days  a week, every calendar day
of the  year. Following a screening, at the request of a caller, the telephone hotline shall promptly
provide the verification set forth in ORS 430.389 [ (2)(h)] (2)(i).
SECTION 10.  ORS 430.392 is amended to read:
430.392. (1) The Division  of Audits of the office of the Secretary of State shall conduct per-
formance  audits  and financial reviews as provided in this section, regarding the uses of the Drug
Treatment and Recovery Services Fund and the effectiveness of  the fund in achieving the purposes
of the fund and the policy objectives of ORS 430.383. Recipients of grants or  funds under ORS
430.389 shall keep accurate books, records and accounts that  are subject to inspection and audit by
the division.
(2) [No later than two years after the completion of an audit or financial review, ]The division shall
monitor and report on the progress in implementing any recommendations made in the audit  or fi-
nancial review. The division shall follow up on recommendations as  part of recurring audit work
or as an activity  separate from other audit activity. When following up on recommendations, the
division may request from the appropriate agency evidence of implementation.
(3) The audits set forth in this section shall be conducted pursuant  to the provisions of ORS
chapter 297, except to the extent any  provision of ORS chapter 297 conflicts with any provision of
ORS 293.665 and 305.231 and 430.383 to 430.390, in which case the provisions of ORS 293.665 and
305.231 and 430.383 to 430.390 shall control.
(4) No later than December 31, 2023, the division shall perform a:
(a) Real-time audit, as prescribed by the division, which shall include  an assessment of the re-
lationship between the Oversight and Accountability Council and the Oregon Health  Authority, the
relationship between the council and recipients  of grants or funding and the structural integrity of
ORS 293.665 and 305.231 and 430.383 to 430.390, including but not limited to assessing:
(A) Whether the organizational structure of the council contains conflicts or problems.
(B) Whether the rules adopted by the council are clear and functioning properly.
(C) Whether the council  has sufficient authority and independence to achieve the council’s
mission.
(D) Whether the authority is fulfilling the authority’s duties under ORS  430.384, 430.387,
[430.388,] 430.390 and 430.391.
(E) Whether there are conflicts of interest in the process of awarding grants or funding.
(F) Whether there are opportunities  to expand collaboration between the council and state
agencies.
(G) Whether barriers exist in data collection and evaluation mechanisms.
(H) Who is providing the data.
(I) Other areas identified by the division.
(b) Financial review, which shall include an assessment of the following:
[(A) The functioning of the grants and funding systems  between the council, the authority and re-
cipients of grants or funding, including by gathering information on  who is receiving what grants and
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 7
funding, the process of applying for the grants and funding and whether that process is conducive to
obtaining qualified applicants and applicants from communities of color. ]
[(B)] (A)  Whether grants and funding are going to organizations that  are culturally responsive
and linguistically specific, including an assessment of:
(i) The barriers  that exist for grant and funding applicants who are Black, Indigenous or People
of Color.
(ii) The applicants that were denied and why.
(iii) Whether grants and other funding are  being disbursed based on the priorities specified in
ORS 430.389.
(iv) For government entities receiving grants or funding under ORS 430.389, the  government
entities’ subgrantees and whether the governmental entity supplanted or decreased any local funding
dedicated to the same services after receiving grants or funds under ORS 430.389.
[(v) Whether the authority has stayed within its administrative spending cap. ]
[(vi)] (v) What proportion of grants or funds  received by grantees and others under ORS 430.389,
was devoted to administrative costs.
[(C)] (B)  The organizations and agencies receiving grants or funding under ORS 430.389 and:
(i) Which of the organizations and agencies are Behavioral Health Resource Network entities.
(ii) The amount each organization and agency received.
(iii) The total number of organizations and agencies that applied for grants or funding.
(iv) The amount of moneys from the fund that were used to administer the  programs selected
by the council.
(v) The moneys that remained in the  Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund after grants
and funding were disbursed.
[(vi) A performance assessment of each grant or funding recipient. ]
[(D) Other areas identified by the division. ]
(5) No later than December 31, [ 2024] 2025 , the division shall conduct a performance audit,
which must include an assessment of the following:
(a) All  relevant data regarding the implementation of ORS 153.062 and 430.391, including demo-
graphic information on individuals who receive citations subject to ORS 153.062  and 430.391 and
whether the citations resulted in connecting the individuals with treatment.
(b) The functioning of:
(A) Law enforcement and the courts in relation to Class E violation citations;
(B) The telephone hotline operated by the authority; [ and]
(C) Entities providing verification of screenings under ORS 430.389[ .]; and
(D) The grants and funding systems  between the council, the authority and recipients
of grants or funding,  including by gathering information about which entities are receiving
grants or funding and what the grants or funding are used  for, the process of applying for
grants or funding and whether the process is conducive  to obtaining qualified applicants for
grants or funding who are from communities of color.
(c) Disparities  shown by demographic data and whether the citation data reveals a dispropor-
tionate use of citations in communities most impacted by the war on drugs.
(d) Whether ORS 153.062, 430.389 and 430.391 reduce the  involvement in the criminal justice
system of individuals with substance use [ disorder].
(e) Training opportunities  provided to law enforcement officials regarding services that
are available and how to connect individuals to the services.
(f) The efficacy of issuing citations as a method of connecting individuals to services.
(g) The role of the implementation of ORS 430.383 to 430.390 in reducing overdose rates.
[(e)] (h)  Outcomes for individuals receiving treatment and other social services under ORS
430.389, including, but not limited to, the following:
(A) Whether access  to care increased since December 3, 2020, and, if data is available, whether,
since December 3, 2020:
(i) The number of drug and alcohol treatment service providers increased.
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 8
(ii) The number of culturally specific providers increased.
[(iii) Overdose rates have decreased. ]
[(iv)] (iii) Access to harm reduction services has increased.
[(v)] (iv) More individuals are accessing treatment than they were before December 3, 2020.
[(vi)] (v)  Access to housing for individuals with substance use [ disorder] has increased.
(B) Data on Behavioral Health  Resource Networks and recipients of grants and funding under
ORS 430.389, including:
(i) The outcomes of each network or recipient, including  but not limited to the number of clients
with substance use [ disorder] receiving services from each network or recipient, the average dura-
tion of client participation and client outcomes.
(ii) The  number of individuals seeking assistance from the network or recipients who are denied
or not connected to substance use [ disorder] treatment and other services, and the  reasons for the
denials.
(iii) The average time it takes for clients to access services and fulfill their individual inter-
vention plan and the reason for any delays, such as waiting lists at referred services.
(iv) Whether average times to access services to which clients are referred, such as housing or
medically assisted treatment, have decreased over time since December 3, 2020.
(v) Demographic data on clients served by Behavioral Health Resource Networks, including
self-reported demographic data on race, ethnicity, gender and age.
(i) Each recipient of a grant or funding.
(j) Other areas identified by the  division for ascertaining best practices for overdose
prevention.
(6) [ After the initial audit and financial review under subsection (4) of this section, ] The division
shall conduct periodic performance audits and financial  reviews pursuant to the division’s annual
audit plan and taking into consideration the risks of the program.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 430.392, as amended by section 10 of this 2023 Act, is amended to read:
430.392. (1) The Division of Audits of the office of the Secretary of State  shall conduct per-
formance audits and financial reviews as provided in this section, regarding the uses of the  Drug
Treatment and Recovery Services Fund and the  effectiveness of the fund in achieving the purposes
of the fund and  the policy objectives of ORS 430.383. Recipients of grants or funds under ORS
430.389 shall keep accurate books, records and accounts that  are subject to inspection and audit by
the division.
(2) The division shall monitor and  report on the progress in implementing any recommendations
made in the audit or financial  review. The division shall follow up on recommendations as part of
recurring audit work or as an activity separate from other audit activity. When  following up on
recommendations, the division may request from the appropriate agency  evidence of implementation.
(3) The audits set forth in this section shall be conducted pursuant  to the provisions of ORS
chapter 297, except to the extent any  provision of ORS chapter 297 conflicts with any provision of
ORS 293.665 and 305.231 and 430.383 to 430.390, in which case the provisions of ORS 293.665 and
305.231 and 430.383 to 430.390 shall control.
[(4) No later than December 31, 2023, the division shall perform a: ]
[(a) Real-time  audit, as prescribed by the division, which shall include an assessment of the re-
lationship between the Oversight and Accountability Council and the Oregon Health Authority, the
relationship between the council  and recipients of grants or funding and the structural integrity of ORS
293.665 and 305.231 and 430.383 to 430.390, including but not limited to assessing: ]
[(A) Whether the organizational structure of the council contains conflicts or problems. ]
[(B) Whether the rules adopted by the council are clear and functioning properly. ]
[(C) Whether the council has  sufficient authority and independence to achieve the council’s
mission.]
[(D) Whether the authority is fulfilling the authority’s duties  under ORS 430.384, 430.387, 430.388,
430.390 and 430.391.]
[(E) Whether there are conflicts of interest in the process of awarding grants or funding. ]
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 9
[(F) Whether there are opportunities to expand collaboration between the council and  state agen-
cies.]
[(G) Whether barriers exist in data collection and evaluation mechanisms. ]
[(H) Who is providing the data. ]
[(I) Other areas identified by the division. ]
[(b) Financial review, which shall include an assessment of the following: ]
[(A) Whether grants and funding are going to  organizations that are culturally responsive and
linguistically specific, including an assessment of: ]
[(i) The barriers that exist for grant and funding applicants who are Black, Indigenous or  People
of Color. ]
[(ii) The applicants that were denied and why. ]
[(iii) Whether  grants and other funding are being disbursed based on the priorities specified in
ORS 430.389.]
[(iv) For  government entities receiving grants or funding under ORS 430.389, the government
entities’ subgrantees and  whether the governmental entity supplanted or decreased any local funding
dedicated to the same services after receiving grants or funds under ORS 430.389. ]
[(v) What proportion of grants or  funds received by grantees and others under ORS 430.389, was
devoted to administrative costs. ]
[(B) The organizations and agencies receiving grants or funding under ORS 430.389 and: ]
[(i) Which of the organizations and agencies are Behavioral Health Resource Network entities. ]
[(ii) The amount each organization and agency received. ]
[(iii) The total number of organizations and agencies that applied for grants or funding. ]
[(iv) The amount of  moneys from the fund that were used to administer the programs selected by
the council. ]
[(v) The moneys that remained in the Drug Treatment and  Recovery Services Fund after grants
and funding were disbursed. ]
[(5) No later than December 31, 2025, the  division shall conduct a performance audit, which must
include an assessment of the following: ]
[(a) All relevant  data regarding the implementation of ORS 153.062 and 430.391, including demo-
graphic information on individuals  who receive citations subject to ORS 153.062 and 430.391 and
whether the citations resulted in connecting the individuals with treatment. ]
[(b) The functioning of: ]
[(A) Law enforcement and the courts in relation to Class E violation citations; ]
[(B) The telephone hotline operated by the authority; ]
[(C) Entities providing verification of screenings under ORS 430.389; and ]
[(D) The grants and funding systems between the council, the  authority and recipients of grants
or funding, including by gathering information about which entities are  receiving grants or funding
and what the grants or  funding are used for, the process of applying for grants or funding and whether
the process is conducive to obtaining qualified applicants for  grants or funding who are from commu-
nities of color. ]
[(c) Disparities shown by demographic data and whether the citation data reveals a dispropor-
tionate use of citations in communities most impacted by the war on drugs. ]
[(d) Whether  ORS 153.062, 430.389 and 430.391 reduce the involvement in the criminal justice
system of individuals with substance use. ]
[(e) Training opportunities provided to  law enforcement officials regarding services that are avail-
able and how to connect individuals to the services. ]
[(f) The efficacy of issuing citations as a method of connecting individuals to services. ]
[(g) The role of the implementation of ORS 430.383 to 430.390 in reducing overdose rates. ]
[(h) Outcomes for individuals receiving  treatment and other social services under ORS 430.389,
including, but not limited to, the following: ]
[(A) Whether access to care increased  since December 3, 2020, and, if data is available, whether,
since December 3, 2020: ]
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 10
[(i) The number of drug and alcohol treatment service providers increased. ]
[(ii) The number of culturally specific providers increased. ]
[(iii) Access to harm reduction services has increased. ]
[(iv) More individuals are accessing treatment than they were before December 3, 2020. ]
[(v) Access to housing for individuals with substance use has increased. ]
[(B) Data on Behavioral Health Resource Networks and  recipients of grants and funding under
ORS 430.389, including: ]
[(i) The outcomes of each network or recipient, including but not limited to  the number of clients
with substance use receiving services from each network or recipient, the average duration of client
participation and client outcomes. ]
[(ii) The number of individuals seeking assistance from the network or recipients who  are denied
or not connected to substance use treatment and other services, and the reasons for the denials. ]
[(iii) The average  time it takes for clients to access services and fulfill their individual intervention
plan and the reason for any delays, such as waiting lists at referred services. ]
[(iv) Whether average times to access services to which clients are referred, such as housing  or
medically assisted treatment, have decreased over time since December 3, 2020. ]
[(v) Demographic data on clients served by Behavioral Health Resource Networks, including self-
reported demographic data on race, ethnicity, gender and age. ]
[(i) Each recipient of a grant or funding. ]
[(j) Other areas identified by the division for ascertaining best practices for overdose prevention. ]
[(6)] (4)  The  division shall conduct periodic performance audits and financial reviews pursuant
to the division’s annual audit plan and taking into consideration the risks of the program.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 430.630 is amended to read:
430.630. (1) In addition to any other requirements that may  be established by rule by the Oregon
Health Authority, each community mental health program, subject to the  availability of funds, shall
provide guidance and assistance to local Behavioral Health Resource  Networks for the joint
development of programs and activities to increase access to treatment and shall provide  the
following basic services to persons with alcoholism or drug  dependence, and persons who are alco-
hol or drug abusers:
(a) Outpatient services;
(b) Aftercare for persons released from hospitals;
(c) Training, case and program consultation and education for community agencies, related
professions and the public;
(d) Guidance and assistance  to other human service agencies for joint development of prevention
programs and activities to reduce  factors causing alcohol abuse, alcoholism, drug abuse and drug
dependence; and
(e) Age-appropriate treatment options for older adults.
(2) As alternatives to state hospitalization, it is the responsibility of the community mental
health program to ensure that, subject to the availability of  funds, the following services for persons
with alcoholism or drug dependence, and persons who are alcohol or drug abusers, are  available
when needed and approved by the Oregon Health Authority:
(a) Emergency services on a 24-hour basis, such  as telephone consultation, crisis intervention
and prehospital screening examination;
(b) Care and treatment  for a portion of the day or night, which may include day treatment
centers, work activity centers and after-school programs;
(c) Residential  care and treatment in facilities such as halfway houses, detoxification centers
and other community living facilities;
(d) Continuity of care, such as that provided by service coordinators, community case develop-
ment specialists and core staff of federally assisted community mental health centers;
(e) Inpatient treatment in community hospitals; and
(f) Other alternative services to  state hospitalization as defined by the Oregon Health Authority.
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 11
(3) In addition to any other requirements that may be established by rule of the  Oregon Health
Authority, each community mental health program, subject to the availability of funds, shall  provide
or ensure the provision of the following services to persons with mental or emotional disturbances:
(a) Screening and evaluation to determine the client’s service needs;
(b) Crisis stabilization to meet the needs of persons with acute  mental or emotional disturb-
ances, including the costs of investigations and prehearing detention in community hospitals  or
other facilities approved by the authority  for persons involved in involuntary commitment proce-
dures;
(c) Vocational and social services that are appropriate for the client’s age,  designed to improve
the client’s vocational, social, educational and recreational functioning;
(d) Continuity of  care to link the client to housing and appropriate and available health and
social service needs;
(e) Psychiatric  care in state and community hospitals, subject to the provisions of subsection (4)
of this section;
(f) Residential services;
(g) Medication monitoring;
(h) Individual, family and group counseling and therapy;
(i) Public education and information;
(j) Prevention of mental or emotional disturbances and promotion of mental health;
(k) Consultation with other community agencies;
(L) Preventive mental health services for  children and adolescents, including primary prevention
efforts, early identification and early intervention services. Preventive services should be patterned
after service models that have demonstrated effectiveness in  reducing the incidence of emotional,
behavioral and cognitive disorders in children. As used in this paragraph:
(A) “Early identification” means detecting  emotional disturbance in its initial developmental
stage;
(B) “Early intervention services” for children at risk of later development of emotional disturb-
ances means programs and activities for children and their families that promote conditions, oppor-
tunities and experiences that  encourage and develop emotional stability, self-sufficiency and
increased personal competence; and
(C) “Primary prevention efforts” means  efforts that prevent emotional problems from occurring
by addressing issues early so that disturbances do not have an opportunity to develop; and
(m) Preventive mental health services for older adults, including primary prevention  efforts,
early identification  and early intervention services. Preventive services should be patterned after
service models that  have demonstrated effectiveness in reducing the incidence of emotional and be-
havioral disorders and suicide attempts in older adults. As used in this paragraph:
(A) “Early identification” means detecting  emotional disturbance in its initial developmental
stage;
(B) “Early intervention services” for older adults at risk of development of emotional disturb-
ances means programs and activities for  older adults and their families that promote conditions,
opportunities and experiences that encourage  and maintain emotional stability, self-sufficiency and
increased personal competence and that deter suicide; and
(C) “Primary prevention efforts” means  efforts that prevent emotional problems from occurring
by addressing issues early so that disturbances do not have an opportunity to develop.
(4) A community  mental health program shall assume responsibility for psychiatric care in state
and community hospitals, as provided in subsection (3)(e) of  this section, in the following circum-
stances:
(a) The person receiving care is a resident of the county served by the program. For purposes
of this paragraph, “resident” means the resident of a county in which the person maintains a current
mailing address or, if the person does not maintain a current mailing address  within the state, the
county in which the person is found, or the county in  which a court-committed person with a mental
illness has been conditionally released.
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 12
(b) The person has been hospitalized involuntarily or voluntarily,  pursuant to ORS 426.130 or
426.220, except for persons confined to  the Secure Child and Adolescent Treatment Unit at Oregon
State Hospital, or has been hospitalized as the result of a revocation of conditional release.
(c) Payment is made for the first 60 consecutive days of hospitalization.
(d) The hospital has collected all available patient payments and third-party reimbursements.
(e) In the case of a community hospital, the authority has approved the hospital for the  care of
persons with mental or emotional disturbances, the community mental health  program has a con-
tract with the hospital for the psychiatric care of residents and a representative of  the program
approves voluntary or involuntary admissions to the hospital prior to admission.
(5) Subject to  the review and approval of the Oregon Health Authority, a community mental
health program may initiate additional services after the  services defined in this section are pro-
vided.
(6) Each  community mental health program and the state hospital serving the program’s ge-
ographic area shall enter into a written agreement concerning the policies and procedures to be
followed by the program and the hospital when a patient is  admitted to, and discharged from, the
hospital and during the period of hospitalization.
(7) Each community mental health program  shall have a mental health advisory committee, ap-
pointed by the board of county commissioners or the county court or, if two or more  counties have
combined to provide mental health services, the boards or courts of the participating  counties or,
in the case of a Native American reservation, the tribal council.
(8) A community mental health program may request and  the authority may grant a waiver re-
garding provision of  one or more of the services described in subsection (3) of this section upon a
showing by the county and a determination by the authority that persons with mental  or emotional
disturbances in that county would be better served and unnecessary institutionalization avoided.
(9)(a) As used in this subsection, “local mental health authority” means  one of the following
entities:
(A) The board of  county commissioners of one or more counties that establishes or operates a
community mental health program;
(B) The tribal council, in the case of a federally recognized tribe of Native Americans that elects
to enter into an agreement to provide mental health services; or
(C) A regional local mental health authority  comprising two or more boards of county commis-
sioners.
(b) Each local mental health authority that provides mental health services shall determine the
need for local mental health services and adopt a comprehensive local plan for the delivery  of
mental health services for children, families,  adults and older adults that describes the methods by
which the local mental health authority shall  provide those services. The purpose of the local plan
is to  create a blueprint to provide mental health services that are directed by and responsive to the
mental health needs of  individuals in the community served by the local plan. A local mental health
authority shall coordinate its local planning with the development of the community health im-
provement plan under ORS 414.575 by the  coordinated care organization serving the area. The
Oregon Health Authority may require a local mental health authority to review and  revise the local
plan periodically.
(c) The local plan shall identify ways to:
(A) Coordinate and ensure accountability for all levels of care described in paragraph (e) of  this
subsection;
(B) Maximize resources for consumers and minimize administrative expenses;
(C) Provide supported employment and other vocational opportunities for consumers;
(D) Determine the most appropriate service provider among a range of qualified providers;
(E) Ensure that appropriate mental health referrals are made;
(F) Address local housing needs for persons with mental health disorders;
(G) Develop a process for discharge from state and local psychiatric hospitals  and transition
planning between levels of care or components of the system of care;
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 13
(H) Provide peer  support services, including but not limited to drop-in centers and paid peer
support;
(I) Provide transportation supports; and
(J) Coordinate services among the criminal  and juvenile justice systems, adult and juvenile
corrections systems and local mental health programs to ensure that persons with mental  illness
who come into contact with the justice and  corrections systems receive needed care and to ensure
continuity of services for adults and juveniles leaving the corrections system.
(d) When developing a local plan, a local mental health authority shall:
(A) Coordinate with the budgetary cycles of state and local governments that provide  the local
mental health authority with funding for mental health services;
(B) Involve consumers,  advocates, families, service providers, schools and other interested par-
ties in the planning process;
(C) Coordinate  with the local public safety coordinating council to address the services de-
scribed in paragraph (c)(J) of this subsection;
(D) Conduct a population based needs assessment to  determine the types of services needed lo-
cally;
(E) Determine the ethnic, age-specific,  cultural and diversity needs of the population served by
the local plan;
(F) Describe the anticipated outcomes of  services and the actions to be achieved in the local
plan;
(G) Ensure that the local plan coordinates planning, funding and services with:
(i) The educational needs of children, adults and older adults;
(ii) Providers of social supports, including but not limited to housing, employment, transporta-
tion and education; and
(iii) Providers of physical health and medical services;
(H) Describe how funds, other than state  resources, may be used to support and implement the
local plan;
(I) Demonstrate  ways to integrate local services and administrative functions in order to support
integrated service delivery in the local plan; and
(J) Involve the local mental health advisory committees described in subsection (7) of this sec-
tion.
(e) The local plan must describe how the local mental health authority will ensure the delivery
of and be accountable for clinically appropriate services in a continuum of care  based on consumer
needs. The local plan shall include, but  not be limited to, services providing the following levels of
care:
(A) Twenty-four-hour crisis services;
(B) Secure and nonsecure extended psychiatric care;
(C) Secure and nonsecure acute psychiatric care;
(D) Twenty-four-hour supervised structured treatment;
(E) Psychiatric day treatment;
(F) Treatments that maximize client independence;
(G) Family and peer support and self-help services;
(H) Support services;
(I) Prevention and early intervention services;
(J) Transition assistance between levels of care;
(K) Dual diagnosis services;
(L) Access to placement in state-funded psychiatric hospital beds;
(M) Precommitment and civil commitment in accordance with ORS chapter 426; and
(N) Outreach to older adults at locations appropriate for making contact with older adults, in-
cluding senior centers, long term care facilities and personal residences.
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 14
(f) In developing the part of the local  plan referred to in paragraph (c)(J) of this subsection, the
local mental health authority shall collaborate with the local public safety coordinating council to
address the following:
(A) Training for all law enforcement officers on ways to recognize and  interact with persons
with mental illness, for the purpose of diverting them  from the criminal and juvenile justice systems;
(B) Developing voluntary locked facilities for  crisis treatment and follow-up as an alternative
to custodial arrests;
(C) Developing a plan for sharing a daily jail and juvenile detention center  custody roster and
the identity of persons of concern and offering mental health services to those in custody;
(D) Developing a  voluntary diversion program to provide an alternative for persons with mental
illness in the criminal and juvenile justice systems; and
(E) Developing mental health services, including housing, for persons with mental  illness prior
to and upon release from custody.
(g) Services described in the local plan shall:
(A) Address the vision, values and guiding principles described in  the Report to the Governor
from the Mental Health Alignment Workgroup, January 2001;
(B) Be provided to children, older adults and families as close to their homes as possible;
(C) Be culturally appropriate and competent;
(D) Be, for children, older adults and adults with mental health needs, from  providers appropri-
ate to deliver those services;
(E) Be delivered in an integrated service delivery system with  integrated service sites or proc-
esses, and with the use of integrated service teams;
(F) Ensure consumer choice among a range of qualified providers in the community;
(G) Be distributed geographically;
(H) Involve consumers, families, clinicians, children and schools in treatment as appropriate;
(I) Maximize early identification and early intervention;
(J) Ensure appropriate  transition planning between providers and service delivery systems, with
an emphasis on transition between children and adult mental health services;
(K) Be based on the ability of a client to pay;
(L) Be delivered collaboratively;
(M) Use age-appropriate, research-based quality indicators;
(N) Use best-practice innovations; and
(O) Be delivered using a community-based, multisystem approach.
(h) A local mental health  authority shall submit to the Oregon Health Authority a copy of the
local plan and  revisions adopted under paragraph (b) of this subsection at time intervals established
by the Oregon Health Authority.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 153.043 is amended to read:
153.043. (1) An enforcement officer issuing a citation for a Class  E violation shall provide the
person receiving the citation  with information concerning how the person may complete a screening,
as specified in ORS 430.389 [ (2)(d)(A)] (2)(e)(A) .
(2) The requirement described in subsection (1)  of this section may be satisfied by providing the
person with the number for the telephone hotline established under ORS 430.391.
SECTION 14.  ORS 153.062 is amended to read:
153.062. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 153.018, 153.019 and 153.021, and  subject to subsection (2) of
this section, a person subject to the penalty for a  Class E violation may, in lieu of the fine, complete
a screening, as set forth in ORS 430.389 [ (2)(d)(A)] (2)(e)(A) , or any other equivalent or more in-
tensive treatment contact, within  45 days of when the person receives the citation for the Class E
violation.
(2) Upon receiving verification that  the person has obtained a screening through a Behavioral
Health Resource Network,  including the telephone hotline described in ORS 430.391 (1), or any other
equivalent or more intensive treatment  contact, within the time period described in subsection (1)
of this section, the court shall dismiss the citation.
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 15
(3) The failure to pay a fine on a  Class E violation is not a basis for further penalties or for a
term of incarceration.
SECTION 15. The amendments to ORS 430.392 by section 11  of this 2023 Act become op-
erative on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 16. Section 17 of this 2023 Act is added to  and made a part of ORS 430.383 to
430.390.
SECTION 17. If approved by the Oversight and Accountability Council, the Oregon Health
Authority may implement an education  campaign to inform the public about the availability
of Behavioral Health Resource Networks, the statewide hotline described in  ORS 430.391 and
any other  information the authority believes would benefit the public in accessing behavioral
health services.
SECTION 18. Section 17 of this 2023 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
Passed by House April 13, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2513 (HB 2513-A) Page 16